Hawaii statutes.
§174C-15 Penalties and common law remedies. (a) The commission may enforce its rules and orders
adopted pursuant to this chapter by suit for injunction or for damages or both.

(b) Any person who
violates any provision of this chapter, or any rule adopted pursuant to this
chapter, may be subject to a fine imposed by the commission. Such fine shall
not exceed $5,000. For a continuing offense, each day during which the offense
is committed is a separate violation.

(c) No provision of
this chapter shall bar the right of any injured person to seek other legal or
equitable relief against a violator of this chapter.

(d) Except as otherwise provided by law, the
commission or its authorized representative by proper delegation may set,
charge, and collect administrative fines or bring legal action to recover
administrative fees and costs as documented by receipts or affidavit, including
attorneys' fees and costs; or bring legal action to recover administrative
fines, fees, and costs, including attorneys' fees and costs, or payment for
damages resulting from a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant
to this chapter. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 142, §6]

Case Notes

Discussed: 782 F. Supp. 2d 1114 (2011).

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next